Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.160

Payment of claims and judgments.

Payment of claims and judgments arising out of tortious conduct or pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq. shall not be made by any agency or department of state government with the exception of the office of risk management, and that office shall authorize and direct the payment of moneys only from the liability account whenever:

(1) The head or governing body of any agency or department of state or the designee of any such agency certifies to the office of risk management that a claim has been settled; or

(2) The clerk of court has made and forwarded a certified copy of a final judgment in a court of competent jurisdiction and the attorney general certifies that the judgment is final and was entered in an action on a claim arising out of tortious conduct or under and pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq. Payment of a judgment shall be made to the clerk of the court for the benefit of the judgment creditors. Upon receipt of payment, the clerk shall satisfy the judgment against the state.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 515; 2002 c 332 s 16; 1999 c 163 s 4; 1991 c 187 s 3; 1986 c 126 s 9; 1979 ex.s. c 144 s 3; 1979 c 151 s 5; 1975 1st ex.s. c 126 s 6; 1969 c 140 s 2; 1963 c 159 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 332: See notes following RCW 43.19.760.

Effective date—1999 c 163: See note following RCW 4.92.130.

Intent—1991 c 187: "It is the intent of the legislature that the tort claims revolving fund created under section 1 of this act have [has] the same purpose, use, and application as the tort claims revolving fund abolished effective July 1, 1989, by the legislature in chapter 419, Laws of 1989." [ 1991 c 187 s 2.]

Severability—1969 c 140: See note following RCW 4.92.130.

Duty of clerk to forward copy of judgment: RCW 4.92.040.